tests/passives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Verbs where final й deletes in passive":
    кыай<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : кыалын
    кыай<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : кыайдым
    тэрий<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : тэрилин
    тэрий<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : тэрийдим
    тэрий<v><tv><pass><ger_past><px3sg><nom> : тэриллибитэ
    арый<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : арылын
    арый<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : арыйдым
    эрчий<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : эрчилин
    эрчий<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : эрчийдим
    эрий<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : эрилин
    эрий<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : эрийдим

  "Verbs where final й does not delete in passive":
    баай<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : баайылын
    баай<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : баайдым
    тиий<v><iv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : тиийилин
    тиий<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : тиийдим
    эрэй<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : эрэйилин
    эрэй<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : эрэйдим

  "Verbs where final н deletes in passive":
    мунньун<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : мунньулун
    мунньун<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : мунньун
    тутун<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : тутулун
    үтүгүн<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : үтүгүлүн
    умун<v><tv><pass><ifi><p1><pl> : умуллубут
    умун<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : умулун
    оҥоһун<v><tv><pass><ifi><p1><pl> : оҥоһуллубут
    оҥоһун<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : оҥоһулун

  "Verbs where final н does not delete in passive":
    туһан<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : туһанылын
    туһан<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : туһанным
    аҕын<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : ахтылын
    аҕын<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : аҕынным

  "Other random passives":
    иҥэр<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : иҥэриллэр
    иҥэр<v><tv><pass><ifi><p1><sg> : иҥэрилинним

  "Regular passive forms":
    оҥор<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : оҥоруллар
    оҥор<v><tv><pass><plu><<p3><sg> : оҥоруллубута

  "Misc passives of forms with {y}":
    иһит<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : иһилин
    уһул<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : уһулун
    оҕус<v><tv><pass><imp><p2><sg> : охсулун

  "Issue number #17":
    билин<v><iv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : билиниллэр
    билин<v><iv><pass><past><p3><sg> : билиниллибит
    билин<v><iv><pass><aor><p3><pl> : билиниллэллэр
    сиэ<v><iv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : сиэниллэр
    сиэ<v><iv><pass><past><p3><sg> : сиэниллибит
    сиэ<v><iv><pass><past><p3><pl> : сиэниллибиттэр
    ырастаа<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : ыраастаныллар
    өйдөө<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : өйдөнүллэр
    ирдээ<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : ирдэниллэр
    хаччахтаа<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : хааччахтаныллар
    тарҕаа<v><iv><pass><past><p3><sg> : тарҕаныллыбыт
    баай<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : бааныллар
